Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6401
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6401 to 44-6414 shall be known and may be cited as the Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist Insurance Coverage Act.

Laws 1986, LB 573, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-571;

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 1.

The act did not apply where it was not in effect at the time the policies were issued to the insured. Polenz v. Farm Bureau Ins. Co., 227 Neb. 703, 419 N.W.2d 677 (1988).